Hawaii, session 2026, SB85.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 46, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§46-    County permit exemption; repetitive construction projects.  A contract for repetitive construction projects of facilities under the control of the department of education, university of Hawaii, or school facilities authority shall be exempt from any applicable county permit requirement due to any county agency having jurisdiction over the proposed action; provided that no contract for repetitive construction projects shall be exempt from federal, state, or county floodplain management development standards or statutes, codes, ordinances, rules, or regulations with which compliance is required under the National Flood Insurance Program." SECTION 2.  Section 103-39.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "§103-39.5  Construction, renovation, or repair of school facilities; county permit exemption.  Any contract for the construction, renovation, or repair of [public school] facilities under the control of the department of education, university of Hawaii, or school facilities authority shall be exempt from any county requirement [of a county] that related off-site improvements be made by the contracting government agency as a condition to the issuance of any permit." SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval and shall be repealed on January 1, 2030; provided that section 103-39.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, shall be reenacted in the form in which it read on the day before the effective date of this Act. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________